Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 60

General Provisions

Effective Dates. Acts 1969, No. 50, § 207: approved Feb. 12, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “Emergency declared to exist. Because the present general laws pertaining to the militia of the state have in many instances become obsolete; in other instances, sections thereof have been in conflict with the laws of the United States; in other cases, many conflicting, unworkable and redundant provisions exist; and because the recodification of the laws governing the state militia will correct the foregoing; an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in force and effect on and after its passage.”

Acts 2019, No. 211, § 23: Feb. 26, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the removal of officers whoare substandard in performance of duty or in conduct, deficient in character,or unsuited for military service is of paramount importance to the good orderand discipline of the Arkansas National Guard and security of the State ofArkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act beingimmediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

12-60-101. Title.

Chapters 60 through 64 of this title shall be known and may be cited as the “Military Code of Arkansas”.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-101; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Chapters 60 through 64 of this title” for “This code” and inserted “and may be cited”.

12-60-102. Definitions.

As used in this code:

“Accuser” means a person who signs and swears to charges, any person who directs that charges nominally be signed and sworn to by another, and any other person who has an interest other than an official interest in the prosecution of the accused;

“Active state duty” means duty in the active military service of the state under an order of the Governor issued pursuant to authority vested in him or her by law and while going to and returning from such duty;

“Code” means the Military Code of Arkansas, Title 12, Chapters 60 through 64;

“Commanding officer” includes only commissioned officers;

“Commissioned officer” includes a commissioned warrant officer;

“Convening authority” includes, in addition to the person who convened the court, a commissioned officer in command for the time being and successors in command;

“Duty status” means the time from the date when a person is required by the terms of a call or order to obey the call or order and includes any of the following periods:

Travel to and from a training site or duty station;

Intervals between consecutive periods of inactive duty training on the same day;

Intervals between inactive duty training on consecutive days; or

The entire day that inactive duty training is performed;

“Enemy” shall be deemed to include any person or persons engaged or participating in a riot, riotous activity, resistance to lawful process, insurrection, or rebellious assembly;

“Enlisted member” means a person enlisted in, or inducted, called, or conscripted into, an armed force in an enlisted grade;

“Extramarital conduct” means any of the following acts engaged in by two (2) persons of the same or opposite sex:

Genital-to-genital sexual intercourse;

Oral-to-genital sexual contact;

Anal-to-genital sexual contact; or

Oral-to-anal sexual contact;

“Grade” means a step or degree in a graduated scale of office or military rank that is established and designated as a grade by law or rule;

“Law officer” means an official of a general court-martial detailed in accordance with this code;

“Military” refers to any or all of the armed forces;

“Military court” means a court-martial, a court of inquiry, or a provost court;

“Officer” means a commissioned or warrant officer;

“Organized militia” means the National Guard of the state as defined in 32 U.S.C. § 101(3);

“Rank” means the order of precedence among members of the armed forces;

“Sexual conduct” means any act of:

Sexual gratification involving penetration, however slight, of the anus or mouth of a person by the penis of another person;

Sexual gratification involving penetration, however slight, of the labia majora or anus of a person by any body member or foreign instrument manipulated by another person;

Penetration, however slight, of the labia majora by a penis;

“State Judge Advocate” means the commissioned officer responsible for supervising the administration of the military justice in the organized militia; and

“Superior commissioned officer” means a commissioned officer superior in rank or command.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “unless the context otherwise requires” following “As used in this code” in the introductory language; added the definition for “Sexual conduct”; deleted definitions for “Duty status other than active state duty”, “May”, and “Shall”; arranged definitions in alphabetical order; substituted “the Military Code of Arkansas, Title 12, Chapters 60 through 64” for “this act” in (3); in (6), substituted “in command” for “commanding” and “and successors in command” for “or a successor in command”; and inserted “enlisted in, or inducted, called, or conscripted into, an armed force” in (8).

The 2019 amendment by No. 211 added the definitions for “Duty status” and “Extramarital conduct”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (11).

Cited: Looper v. Thrash, 334 Ark. 212, 972 S.W.2d 250 (1998).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 46; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-601; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 2; 2019, No. 211, § 1;
2019, No. 315, § 916.

12-60-103. Persons subject to the code.

The following persons who are not in federal service are subject to this code:

Members of the organized militia.

All other persons lawfully ordered to a duty status in or with the organized militia, including the Army National Guard, Air National Guard, the Arkansas Guard, and all persons ordered to a duty status in or with any of the foregoing from the dates they are required by the terms of the order or other directive to obey the code.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “to a duty status” for “to duty” twice in (2).

Cross References. Code to be explained, §12-64-107.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 47; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-602; Acts 2019, No. 211, § 2.

12-60-104. Delegation of authority by the Governor or the commanding general of the organized militia.

The Governor may delegate any authority vested in the Governor under this code, and may provide for the subdelegation of any such authority, except with respect to the power authorized in §§ 12-64-406(a) and 12-64-603(b) of this code.

The commanding general of the organized militia may delegate any authority vested in the commanding general under this code, and may provide for the subdelegation of any such authority, except with respect to the power authorized in §§ 12-64-406(a) and 12-64-603(b) of this code.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added “or the commanding general of the organized militia” in the section heading; in (a), substituted “the Governor” for “him” following “vested in” and substituted “authorized in” for “given him by”; and added (b).

Cross References. Punitive articles, §12-64-801 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 821, § 30: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Effective Dates. Acts 1969, No. 50, § 207: approved Feb. 12, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “Emergency declared to exist. Because the present general laws pertaining to the militia of the state have in many instances become obsolete; in other instances, sections thereof have been in conflict with the laws of the United States; in other cases, many conflicting, unworkable and redundant provisions exist; and because the recodification of the laws governing the state militia will correct the foregoing; an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in force and effect on and after its passage.”

Acts 1977, No. 694, § 9: July 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two-year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1977 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1977 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1977.”

Acts 1983, No. 412, § 5: Mar. 13, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Governor should be granted the authority to designate certain military officers to administer the Oath of Enlistment to new members of the militia; that the crimes of assault and aggravated assault should be specifically provided for by the Military Code; that the jurisdiction of general, special, and summary courts-martial should be clarified; and that this act is immediately necessary to accomplish the same. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 670, § 11: Apr. 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain disciplinary provisions of the state military code need to be strengthened; that this act results in the same and should be given effect prior to the 1985 annual training of the military personnel subject to the state military code; that April 1 is a reasonable date to expect that this act will have been passed by both houses and acted upon by the Governor and that a date certain is desirable for the effective date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after April 1, 1985.”

Acts 1995, No. 639, § 26: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 2007, No. 47, § 11: Feb. 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided:“It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there are many members of the Arkansas National Guard and Reserves that are serving in active duty in Iraq and Afghanistan in the war on terror; that it is critical that Arkansas law be updated and be consistent with federal law and rules; and that this act is necessary to eliminate confusion regarding out-dated and inconsistent provisions in the Military Code of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 128: July 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1981, No. 45, §§ 4, 5, provided that the State Militia and the Arkansas Wing of the Civil Air Patrol, respectively, which were transferred by a type 2 transfer to the Department of Public Safety, Military Division, pursuant to Acts 1971, No. 38, § 14 [repealed], and all their powers, functions, duties, personnel, and funds would be detached from the Department of Public Safety (abolished by Acts 1981, No. 45, § 1) and restored to the State Militia and the State Military Department, the Arkansas Wing of the Civil Air Patrol to operate as a part of the State Military Department, all of which would operate and perform the same powers, functions, and duties as if they had never been transferred to the Department of Public Safety. The sections further provided that all members or heads of the State Militia, State Military Department, and the Arkansas Wing of the Civil Air Patrol would be appointed and serve as if the organizations had never been transferred to the Department of Public Safety. Section 4 provided, however, that the Adjutant General should be appointed as then provided by law.

The sections further provided that the act should not be so construed as to reduce any right that an employee of the State Militia, the State Military Department, or the Arkansas Wing of the Civil Air Patrol would have under any civil service or merit system.

Section 4 additionally provided that all the powers, functions, and duties added to the Military Division of the Department of Public Safety subsequent to the enactment of Acts 1971, No. 38 would be vested in and thereafter performed by the State Militia and the State Military Department.

Cited: Jones v. Clark, 278 Ark. 119, 644 S.W.2d 257 (1983).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 174; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-685; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 3.